test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-odd-noch-vch-kappeer_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - čohhoom: # 1B g-v, hhoo-›ho
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Nom: čohhoom
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Gen: čohhoom
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Acc: čohhoom
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Ill: čohomân
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Loc: čohomist
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Com: čohomáin
    čohhoom+N+Sg+Abe: čohhoomttáá
    čohhoom+N+Ess: čohomin
    čohhoom+N+Par: čohomid
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Nom: čohomeh
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Gen: čohomij
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Acc: čohomijd
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Ill: čohomáid
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Loc: čohomijn
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Com: čohomijguin
    čohhoom+N+Pl+Abe: čohomijttáá

  Noun - immeel: # 1B g-v, CCVV > CV
    immeel+N+Sg+Nom: immeel
    immeel+N+Sg+Gen: immeel
    immeel+N+Sg+Acc: immeel
    immeel+N+Sg+Ill: imelân
    immeel+N+Sg+Loc: imelist
    immeel+N+Sg+Com: imeláin
    immeel+N+Sg+Abe: immeelttáá
    immeel+N+Ess: imelin
    immeel+N+Par: imelid
    immeel+N+Pl+Nom: imeleh
    immeel+N+Pl+Gen: imelij
    immeel+N+Pl+Acc: imelijd
    immeel+N+Pl+Ill: imeláid
    immeel+N+Pl+Loc: imelijn
    immeel+N+Pl+Com: imelijguin
    immeel+N+Pl+Abe: imelijttáá

  Noun - kahhaan: # 1B g-v, CCVV-›CV
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Nom: kahhaan
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Gen: kahhaan
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Acc: kahhaan
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Ill: kahanjân
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Loc: kahanjist
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Com: kahanjáin
    kahhaan+N+Sg+Abe: kahhaanttáá
    kahhaan+N+Ess: kahanjin
    kahhaan+N+Par: kahanjid
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Nom: kahanjeh
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Gen: kahanjij
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Acc: kahanjijd
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Ill: kahanjáid
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Loc: kahanjijn
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Com: kahanjijguin
    kahhaan+N+Pl+Abe: kahanjijttáá



  Noun - kappeer: # C stems Morottaja ja Olthuis
    kappeer+N+Sg+Nom: kappeer
    kappeer+N+Sg+Gen: kappeer
    kappeer+N+Sg+Acc: kappeer
    kappeer+N+Sg+Ill: kaperân
    kappeer+N+Sg+Loc: kaperist
    kappeer+N+Sg+Com: kaperáin
    kappeer+N+Sg+Abe: kappeerttáá
    kappeer+N+Ess: kaperin
    kappeer+N+Par: kaperid
    kappeer+N+Pl+Nom: kapereh
    kappeer+N+Pl+Gen: kaperij
    kappeer+N+Pl+Acc: kaperijd
    kappeer+N+Pl+Ill: kaperáid
    kappeer+N+Pl+Loc: kaperijn
    kappeer+N+Pl+Com: kaperijguin
    kappeer+N+Pl+Abe: kaperijttáá
    
